District of Columbia statutes.
14-303

Testimony of deceased or incapable person.

When a party, after having testified at a time while he was competent to do so, dies or becomes incapable of testifying, his testimony may be given in evidence in any trial or hearing in relation to the same subject-matter between the same parties or their legal representatives, as the case may be; and in such a case the opposite party may testify in opposition thereto.

Dec. 23, 1963, 77 Stat. 519, Pub. L. 88-241, § 1
1981 Ed., § 14-303.
1973 Ed., § 14-303.